Utah, session 2026, SB202.
Section 1. Section 10-8-85.11 is enacted to read:10-8-85.11. Golf courses -- Limitations on municipal ordinances restricting golf course maintenance.(1)As used in this section:(a)"Golf course" means:(i)a privately owned golf course that is located, in whole or in part, within municipal boundaries; or(ii)a golf course located, in whole or in part, within municipal boundaries, that is owned by a county, municipality, or other governmental entity.(b)"Maintenance operations" means mowing or trimming grass as part of the routine upkeep of golf course grounds.(2)Except as provided in Subsection (3), a municipality may not enact or enforce an ordinance that prohibits a golf course from conducting maintenance operations between the hours of 5:30 a.m. and 10 p.m.(3)A municipality may prohibit or restrict maintenance operations at a golf course at any time if the golf course is owned by the municipality.

Section 2:
Section 2. Section 17-60-509 is enacted to read:17-60-509. Golf courses -- Limitations on county ordinances restricting golf course maintenance.(1)As used in this section:(a)"Golf course" means:(i)a privately owned golf course that is located, in whole or in part, within an unincorporated area of the county; or(ii)a golf course located, in whole or in part, within an unincorporated area of the county, that is owned by a county, municipality, or other governmental entity.(b)"Maintenance operations" means mowing, trimming, or related activities necessary for the routine upkeep of golf course grounds.(2)Except as provided in Subsection (3), a county may not enact or enforce an ordinance that prohibits a golf course from conducting maintenance operations between the hours of 5:30 a.m. and 10 p.m.(3)A county may prohibit or restrict maintenance operations at a golf course at any time if the golf course is owned by the county.

Section 3:
Section 3.  Effective Date.This bill takes effect on May 6, 2026.